Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-2230 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This section shall be known and may be cited as the


“Protecting Patients Act of 2026”.


B. As used in this act:


1. “Assisted reproduction” means a method of causing pregnancy


other than sexual intercourse. The term includes, but is not

Req. No. 2670 Page 1


limited to, intrauterine insemination, donation of eggs, donation of


embryos, in vitro fertilization, transfer of embryos, and


intracytoplasmic sperm injection;


2. “Fertility fraud” means the act of knowingly:


a. misrepresenting the nature, source, or origin of human


reproductive materials used in assisted insemination,


in vitro fertilization, gamete intrafallopian


transfer, zygote intrafallopian transfer, or any other


form of assisted reproduction, or


b. performing assisted reproduction services on a patient


using human reproductive materials from a donor if the


patient has not expressly consented to the use of such


material from that particular donor;


3. “Human reproductive material” means one or more human


gametes or any human deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) used in or for the


purpose of human reproduction or in the process of performing


assisted reproduction; and


4. “Person” means an individual, corporation, government or


governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,


partnership or association, or any other legal entity.


C. It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly:


1. Engage in any act of fertility fraud; or


2. Allow or enable the person’s own human reproductive


materials or DNA to be used for the purposes of fertility fraud.

Req. No. 2670 Page 2


Any person who engages in an act described in this paragraph shall


be an accessory to fertility fraud.


D. 1. Every person who has reason to believe that fertility


fraud has occurred at any hospital or other facility where assisted


reproduction services are performed shall promptly report the matter


to local law enforcement. This subsection shall not be construed to


require a victim of fertility fraud or the child of the victim to


report the crime committed against the victim.


2. In reports required by this subsection, local law


enforcement shall keep confidential and redact any information


identifying the reporting individual, the alleged victim, and the


alleged perpetrator unless otherwise ordered by the court or as may


be required for the purposes of interdepartmental or


interjurisdictional investigations of the allegation.


3. Any employer, supervisor, administrator, governing body or


entity who discharges, discriminates against, or retaliates against


an employee or other person for reporting suspected fertility fraud


as required by this subsection shall be liable to the employee or


other person for damages, court costs, and reasonable attorney fees.


E. 1. It shall be the duty of any municipal police department


or sheriff’s office that receives a report alleging an offense


involving fertility fraud to provide all such reports to the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation (OSBI).



Req. No. 2670 Page 3


2. OSBI shall investigate any report alleging that any person


has:


a. engaged in fertility fraud,


b. been an accessory to fertility fraud, or


c. neglected to promptly report an incidence of fertility


fraud as required under subsection D of this section.


F. 1. In addition to any other penalties provided by law, any


person who:


a. commits fertility fraud shall, upon conviction, be


guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the


custody of the Department of Corrections for a term


not less than ten (10) years and not more than life or


life without parole, or


b. is an accessory to fertility fraud or neglects to


report fertility fraud shall, upon conviction, be


guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the


custody of the Department of Corrections for a term


not more than fourteen (14) years and seven (7)


months.


2. If the offender is a health care provider, the appropriate


licensure board shall, immediately upon conviction, permanently


revoke the license of the health care provider and the offender


shall be prohibited from receiving any other type of health care



Req. No. 2670 Page 4


provider license, certificate, or other credential issued by this


state.


3. Except for persons sentenced to life or life without parole,


any person convicted under subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of this


subsection shall:


a. serve a term of post-imprisonment community


supervision as required by Section 991a of Title 22 of


the Oklahoma Statutes under conditions determined by


the court, and


b. register as a sex offender under the Sex Offenders


Registration Act.


4. In the event that DNA testing leads to the identification of


a person who has violated subsection A of this section, no statute


of limitation that would otherwise preclude the prosecution of an


offense under subsection A of this section shall preclude such


prosecution until a date that is at least ten (10) years after the


date on which the person was identified.


5. Any acts by a health care provider that inadvertently aid in


the commission of fertility fraud shall not be unlawful under this


section if the aid is not provided knowingly.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2670 DC 1/15/2026 9:49:43 AM



Req. No. 2670 Page 5